Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8504.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28-5-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-5 entitled "Fair
Employment Practices" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-5-6. Definitions.
When used in this chapter:
(1) “Age” means anyone who is at least forty (40) years of age.
(2) “Because of sex” or “on the basis of sex” includes, but is not limited to, because of or
on the basis of pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions, and women affected by
pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions shall be treated the same for all employment
related purposes, including receipt of benefits under fringe benefit programs, as other persons not
so affected but similar in their ability or inability to work, and nothing in this chapter shall be
interpreted to permit otherwise.
(3) “Commission” means the Rhode Island commission against discrimination created by
this chapter.
(4) “Confidential” means to remain secret and not to be disclosed to another person or
entity.
(5) “Conviction” means, for the purposes of this chapter only, any verdict or finding of
guilt after a criminal trial or any plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a criminal charge.
(6) “Disability” means a disability as defined in § 42-87-1.
(7) “Discriminate” includes segregate or separate.

(8) “Employee” does not include any individual employed by their parents, spouse, or
child, or in the domestic service of any person.
(9)(i) “Employer” includes the state and all political subdivisions of the state and any
person in this state employing four (4) or more individuals, and any person acting in the interest of
an employer directly or indirectly.
(ii) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to apply to a religious corporation,
association, educational institution, or society with respect to the employment of individuals of its
religion to perform work connected with the carrying on of its activities.
(10) “Employment agency” includes any person undertaking, with or without
compensation, to procure opportunities to work, or to procure, recruit, refer, or place employees.
(11) “Firefighter” means an employee the duties of whose position include work connected
with the control and extinguishment of fires or the maintenance and use of firefighting apparatus
and equipment, including an employee engaged in this activity who is transferred or promoted to a
supervisory or administrative position.
(12) “Gender identity or expression” includes a person’s actual or perceived gender, as
well as a person’s gender identity, gender-related self image, gender-related appearance, or gender-
related expression; whether or not that gender identity, gender-related self image, gender-related
appearance, or gender-related expression is different from that traditionally associated with the
person’s sex at birth.
(13) “Labor organization” includes any organization that exists for the purpose, in whole
or in part, of collective bargaining or of dealing with employers concerning grievances, terms or
conditions of employment, or of other mutual aid or protection in relation to employment.
(14) “Law enforcement officer” means an employee the duties of whose position include
investigation, apprehension, or detention of individuals suspected or convicted of offenses against
the criminal laws of the state, including an employee engaged in such activity who is transferred or
promoted to a supervisory or administrative position. For the purpose of this subdivision,
“detention” includes the duties of employees assigned to guard individuals incarcerated in any
penal institution.
(15) “Non-disparagement agreement” means an agreement which restricts an individual
from taking any action to include, but not be limited to, speaking or publicizing information that
negatively impacts the other party to the agreement to include the reputation, products, services,
employees, and management of the protected party.
(16) “Person” includes one or more individuals, partnerships, associations, organizations,
corporations, legal representatives, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, or receivers.
LC006242 - Page 2 of 4

(17) “Protective hairstyles” means and includes, but is not limited to, hair texture or
hairstyles, if that hair texture or that hairstyle is commonly associated with a particular race or
national origin (including a hairstyle in which hair is tightly coiled or tightly curled, locks,
cornrows, twists, braids, Bantu knots, and Afros).
(18) “Race” means and includes traits historically associated with the race, including, but
not limited to, hair texture and protective hairstyles.
(19) “Religion” includes all aspects of religious observance and practice, as well as belief,
unless an employer, union, or employment agency demonstrates that it is unable to reasonably
accommodate to an employee’s or prospective employee’s or union member’s religious observance
or practice without undue hardship on the conduct of its business.
(20) “Sexual orientation” means having or being perceived as having an orientation for
heterosexuality, bisexuality, or homosexuality.
(21) The terms, as used regarding persons with disabilities:
(i) “Auxiliary aids and services” and “reasonable accommodation” shall have the same
meaning as those items are defined in § 42-87-1.1; and
(ii) “Hardship” means an “undue hardship” as defined in § 42-87-1.1.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006242
========
LC006242 - Page 3 of 4